North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 49D. Poultry Products Inspection Act.
§ 106-549.62.
Intrastate operations exemptions.

The Board shall, by regulation and under such conditions, including requirements, as to sanitary standards, practices, and procedures as it may prescribe, exempt from specific provisions of this Article with respect to processing of poultry or poultry products solely for intrastate commerce and distribution of poultry or poultry products only in such commerce:

Retail dealers with respect to poultry products sold directly to consumers in individual retail stores, if the only processing operation performed by such retail dealers is the cutting up of poultry products on the premises where such sales to consumers are made;

For such period of time as the Commissioner determines that it would be impracticable to provide inspection and the exemption will aid in the effective administration of this Article, any person engaged in the processing of poultry or poultry products and the poultry or poultry products processed by such person: Provided, however, that no such exemption shall continue in effect more than 120 days after enactment of this Article;

Persons slaughtering, processing, or otherwise handling poultry or poultry products which have been or are to be processed as required by recognized religious dietary laws, to the extent that the Commissioner determines necessary to avoid conflict with such requirements while still effectuating the purposes of this Article;

The slaughtering by any person of poultry of his own raising, and the processing by him and transportation of the poultry products exclusively for use by him and members of his household and his nonpaying guests and employees;

The custom slaughter by any person of poultry delivered by the owner thereof for such slaughter, and the processing by such slaughterer and transportation of the poultry products exclusively for use, in the household of such owner, by him and members of his household and his nonpaying guests and employees: Provided, that such custom slaughterer does not engage in the business of buying or selling any poultry products capable of use as human food;

The slaughtering and processing of poultry products by any poultry producer on his own premises with respect to sound and healthy poultry raised on his premises and the distribution by any person of the poultry products derived from such operations, if, in lieu of other labeling requirements, such poultry products are identified with the name and address of such poultry producer, and if they are not otherwise misbranded, and are sound, clean, and fit for human food when so distributed; and

The slaughtering of sound and healthy poultry or the processing of poultry products of such poultry by any poultry producer or other person for distribution by him directly to household consumers, restaurants, hotels, and boardinghouses, for use in their own dining rooms, or in the preparation of meals for sales direct to consumers, if, in lieu of other labeling requirements, such poultry products are identified with the name and address of the processor, and if they are not otherwise misbranded and are sound, clean, and fit for human food when distributed by such processor.

In addition to the specific exemptions authorized in subsection (a), the Board shall, when it determines that the protection of consumers from adulterated or misbranded poultry products will not be impaired by such action, provide by regulation, consistent with subsection (c) for the exemption of the operation and products of small enterprises (including poultry producers), not exempted under subsection (a), which are engaged in slaughtering and/or cutting up poultry for distribution as carcasses or parts thereof, solely for distribution within this State, from such provisions of this Article as it deems appropriate, while still protecting the public from adulterated or misbranded products, under such conditions, including sanitary requirements, as it shall prescribe to effectuate the purposes of this Article.

The exemptions provided for in subdivisions (a)(6) and (7) above shall not apply if the poultry producer or other person engages in the current calendar year in the business of buying or selling any poultry or poultry products other than as specified in such subdivisions. No exemption under subdivisions (a)(6) or (7) or subsection (b) shall apply to any poultry producer or other person who slaughters or processes the products of more than 20,000 birds of all species during the calendar year for which this exemption is being applied.

The provisions of this Article requiring inspection shall not apply to operations of types traditionally and usually conducted at retail stores and restaurants, when conducted at any retail store or restaurant or similar retail-type establishment for sale in normal retail quantities or service of such articles to consumers at such establishments, if no poultry or poultry products are processed at the establishment for distribution outside this State or otherwise subject to inspection under the Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act.

The provisions of this Article shall not apply to poultry producers with respect to poultry of their own raising on their own farms if (i) such producers slaughter not more than 1,000 birds of all species during the calendar year for which this exemption is being determined; (ii) such poultry producers do not engage in buying or selling poultry products other than those produced from poultry raised on their own farms; and (iii) such poultry moves only in intrastate commerce.

The adulteration and misbranding provisions of this Article, other than the requirement of the inspection legend, shall apply to articles which are exempted from inspection under this section, except as otherwise specified under subsections (a), (b), or (e).

The Commissioner may by order suspend or terminate any exemption under subsections (a) or (b) of this section with respect to any person whenever he finds that such action will aid in effectuating the purposes of this Article.

History.

1971, c. 677, s. 15; 2009-102, ss. 3, 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-102, ss. 3 and 4, effective June 15, 2009, in subsection (c), substituted “20,000 birds of all species during the calendar year for which this exemption is being applied” for “5,000 turkeys or an
equivalent number of poultry of all species in the current calendar year (four birds of other species being deemed the equivalent of one turkey)”; and in subsection (e), substituted “1,000 birds of all species during the calendar year for which this exemption is being determined” for “250 turkeys, or not more than an equivalent number of birds of all species during the calendar year for which this exemption is being determined (four birds of other species being deemed the equivalent of one turkey).”

§ 106-549.63.
Commissioner may limit entry of products to establishments.

The Commissioner may limit the entry of poultry products and other materials into any official establishment, under such conditions as he may prescribe to assure that allowing the entry of such articles into such inspected establishments will be consistent with the purposes of this Article.

History.

1971, c. 677, s. 16.

§ 106-549.64.
Refusal of inspection services; hearing; appeal.

The Commissioner may (for such period, or indefinitely, as he deems necessary to effectuate the purposes of this Article) refuse to provide, or withdraw, inspection service under this Article with respect to any establishment if he determines that such applicant or recipient is unfit to engage in any business requiring inspection upon this Article because the applicant or recipient or anyone responsibly connected with the applicant or recipient, has been convicted, in any federal or State court, within the previous 10 years of:

Any felony or more than one misdemeanor under any law based upon the acquiring, handling, or distributing of adulterated, mislabeled, or deceptively packaged food or fraud in connection with transactions in food; or

Any felony, involving fraud, bribery, extortion, or any other act or circumstances indicating a lack of the integrity needed for the conduct of operations affecting the public health. For the purpose of this subsection a person shall be deemed to be responsibly connected with the business if he was a partner, officer, director, holder, or owner of ten per centum (10%) or more of its voting stock or employee in a managerial or executive capacity.

Proceedings concerning the refusal or withdrawal of inspection services shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. A refusal or withdrawal of inspection services by the Commissioner shall continue in effect pending a final decision in a contested case unless the Commissioner orders otherwise.

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 827, s. 37.

History.

1971, c. 677, s. 17; 1973, c. 1331, s. 3; 1987, c. 827, s. 37.

§ 106-549.65.
Product detained if in violation.

Whenever any poultry product, or any product exempted from the definition of a poultry product, or any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased poultry is found by any inspector of the Meat and Poultry Inspection Service of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services upon any premises where it is held for purposes of, or during or after distribution in intrastate commerce, and there is reason to believe that any such article is adulterated or misbranded and is capable of use as human food, or that it has not been inspected, in violation of the provisions of this Article or of any other State or federal law or that it has been or is intended to be, distributed in violation of any such provisions, it may be detained by such representative for a period not to exceed 20 days, pending action under

G.S. 106-549.66

or notification of any federal, State, or other governmental authorities having jurisdiction over such article or poultry, and shall not be moved by any person, from the place at which it is located when so detained, until released by such representative. All official marks may be required by such representative to be removed from such article or poultry before it is released unless it appears to the satisfaction of the area supervisor of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services Poultry Inspection Service that the article or poultry is eligible to retain such marks.

History.

1971, c. 677, s. 18; 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-549.66.
Seizure or condemnation proceedings.

Any poultry product, or any dead, dying, or disabled, or diseased poultry, that is being transported in intrastate commerce, subject to this Article, or is held for sale in this State after such transportation, and that

Is or has been processed, sold, transported, or otherwise distributed or offered or received for distribution in violation of this Article, or

Is capable of use as human food and is adulterated or misbranded, or

In any other way is in violation of this Article, shall be liable to be proceeded against and seized and condemned, at any time, on an affidavit filed in any superior court within the jurisdiction of which the article or poultry is found. If the article or poultry is condemned it shall, after entry of the judgment, be disposed of by destruction or sale as the court may direct and the proceeds, if sold, less the court costs and fees, and storage and other proper expenses, shall be paid into the general fund of this State, but the article or poultry shall not be sold contrary to the provisions of this Article, or the Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act or the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act: Provided, that upon the execution and delivery of a good and sufficient bond conditioned that the article or poultry shall not be sold or otherwise disposed of contrary to the provisions of this Article or the laws of the United States, the court may direct that such article or poultry be delivered to the owner thereof subject to such supervision by authorized representatives of the Commissioner as is necessary to insure compliance with the applicable laws. When an order of condemnation is entered against the article or poultry and it is released under bond, or destroyed, court costs and fees, and storage and other proper expenses shall be awarded against the person, if any, intervening as claimant of the article or poultry. The proceedings in such cases shall conform, as nearly as may be, to civil actions and either party may demand trial by jury of any issue of fact joined in any case, and all such proceedings shall be at the suit of and in the name of the State.

The provisions of this section shall in no way derogate from authority for condemnation or seizure conferred by other provisions of this Article, or other laws.

History.

1971, c. 677, s. 19.

§ 106-549.67.
Superior court jurisdiction; proceedings in name of State.

The superior court is vested with jurisdiction specifically to enforce, and to prevent and restrain violations of this Article, and shall have jurisdiction in all other kinds of cases arising under this Article. All proceedings for the enforcement or to restrain violations of this Article shall be by and in the name of this State.

History.

1971, c. 677, s. 20.

§ 106-549.68.
Powers of Commissioner; subpoenas; mandamus; self-incrimination; penalties.

The Commissioner shall also have power:

To gather and compile information concerning and, to investigate from time to time the organization, business, conduct, practices, and management of any person engaged in intrastate commerce, and the relation thereof to other persons;

To require, by general or special orders, persons engaged in intrastate commerce, or any class of them, or any of them to file with the Commissioner, in such form as the Commissioner may prescribe, annual or special, or both annual and special, reports or answers in writing to specific questions, furnishing to the Commissioner such information as he may require as to the organization, business, conduct, practices, management, and relation to other persons of the person filing such reports or answers in writing. Such reports and answers shall be made under oath, or otherwise, as the Commissioner may prescribe, and shall be filed with the Commissioner within such reasonable period as the Commissioner may prescribe, unless additional time be granted in any case by the Commissioner.

For the purposes of this Article the Commissioner shall at all reasonable times have access to, for the purpose of examination, and the right to copy, any documentary evidence of any person being investigated or proceeded against, and may require by subpoena the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of all documentary evidence of any person relating to any matter under investigation. The Commissioner may sign subpoenas and may administer oaths and affirmations, examine witnesses, and receive evidence.

Such attendance of witnesses, and the production of such documentary evidence, may be required at any designated place of hearing. In case of disobedience to a subpoena the Commissioner may invoke the aid of any court designated in

G.S. 106-549.67

in requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of documentary evidence.

Any of the courts designated in

G.S. 106-549.67

within the jurisdiction of which such inquiry is carried on may, in case of contumacy or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person, issue an order requiring such person to appear before the Commissioner or to produce documentary evidence if so ordered, or to give evidence touching the matter in question; and any failure to obey such order of the court may be punished by such court as a contempt thereof.

Upon the application of the Attorney General of this State at the request of the Commissioner, the superior court shall have jurisdiction to issue writs or [of] mandamus commanding any person to comply with the provisions of this Article or any order of the Commissioner made in pursuance thereof.

The Commissioner may order testimony to be taken by deposition in any proceeding or investigation pending under this Article at any stage of such proceeding or investigation. Such depositions may be taken before any person designated by the Commissioner and having power to administer oaths. Such testimony shall be reduced to writing by the person taking the deposition, or under his direction and shall then be subscribed by the deponent. Any person may be compelled to appear and depose and to produce documentary evidence in the same manner as witnesses may be compelled to appear and testify and produce documentary evidence before the Commissioner as hereinbefore provided.

Witnesses summoned before the Commissioner shall be paid the same fees and mileage that are paid witnesses in the courts of this State, and witnesses whose depositions are taken and the persons taking the same shall severally be entitled to the same fees as are paid for like services in such courts.

No person shall be excused from attending and testifying or from producing books, papers, schedules of charges, contracts, agreements, or other documentary evidence before the Commissioner or in obedience to the subpoena of the Commissioner whether such subpoena be signed or issued by him or his delegate, or in any cause or proceeding, criminal or otherwise, based upon or growing out of any alleged violation of this Article, or of any amendments thereto, on the ground or for the reason that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of him or it may tend to incriminate him or it or subject him or it to a penalty or forfeiture; but no individual shall be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he is compelled, after having claimed his privilege against self-incrimination, to testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, except that any individual so testifying shall not be exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in so testifying.

Any person that shall neglect or refuse to attend and testify or to answer any lawful inquiry, or to produce documentary evidence, if in his or its power to do so, in obedience to the subpoena or lawful requirement of the Commissioner shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Any person that shall willfully make, or cause to be made, any false entry or statement of fact in any report required to be made under this Article, or that shall willfully make, or cause to be made, any false entry in any account, record, or memorandum kept by any person subject to this Article or that shall willfully neglect or fail to make, or to cause to be made, full, true, and correct entries in such accounts, records, or memoranda, of all facts and transactions appertaining to the business of any person subject to this Article or that shall willfully remove out of the jurisdiction of this State, or willfully mutilate, alter, or by any other means falsify any documentary evidence of any such person, or that shall willfully refuse to submit to the Commissioner or to any of his authorized agents, for the purpose of inspection and taking copies, any documentary evidence of any person subject to this Article in his or its possession or within his or its control, shall be deemed guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

If any person required by this Article to file any annual or special report shall fail so to do within the time fixed by the Commissioner for filing the same, and such failure shall continue for 30 days after notice of such default, such person shall forfeit to this State the sum of one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each and every day of the continuance of such failure, which forfeiture shall be payable into the general fund of this State, and shall be recoverable in a civil suit in the name of the State brought in the superior court where the person has his or its principal office or in any county in which he or it shall do business. It shall be the duty of the Attorney General of this State, to prosecute for the recovery of such forfeitures. The costs and expenses of such prosecution shall be paid out of the amount recovered in such action.

Any officer or employee of this State who shall make public any information obtained by the Commissioner without his authority, unless directed by a court, shall be deemed guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1971, c. 677, s. 21; 1993, c. 539, ss. 803-805; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 14, s. 55; c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 106-549.68A.
Article applicable to those regulated by federal act.

The requirements of this Article shall apply to persons, establishments, poultry, poultry products and other articles regulated under the Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act only to the extent provided for in section 23 of said federal act.

History.

1971, c. 677, s. 22.

§ 106-549.69.
Inspection costs.

The cost of inspection rendered under the requirements of this Article, shall be borne by this State, except as provided in

G.S. 106-549.52

and except that the cost of overtime and holiday work performed in establishments subject to the provisions of this Article, at such rates as the Commissioner may determine shall be borne by such establishments. Sums received by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services in reimbursement for sums paid out for such premium pay work shall be available without fiscal year limitation to carry out the purposes of this section.

History.

1971, c. 677, s. 23; 1997-261, s. 109.